Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-223
Board; rules and regulations; inspections; record of proceedings.

The board shall have authority to adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations for the administration of the Barber Act. Any member of the board, its agents, or its assistants shall have authority to enter upon and to inspect any barber shop or barber school at any time during business hours. A copy of the rules and regulations adopted by the board shall be furnished to the owner or manager of each barber shop and barber school, and it shall be posted in a conspicuous place in such barber shop or barber school. The board shall keep a record of proceedings relating to the issuance, refusal, renewal, suspension, and revocation of registrations and licenses and inspections. Such record shall also contain the name, place of business, and residence of each registered barber instructor and licensed barber and the date and number of his or her registration or license.

Laws 1927, c. 163, § 20, p. 435;

R.S.1943, § 71-223;

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 28, p. 1327;

Laws 1993, LB 226, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 26.